Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8209
Complete data set, defined.

Complete data set means a predetermined set of demographic and medical definitions that includes the minimum data set with additional data points as set forth in the rules and regulations adopted under the Statewide Trauma System Act.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 9.